Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
Chapter 9. Pensions
[Repealed]

§§ 35-9-1 through 35-9-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 396, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§35-9-1. [Codes, 1930, § 5807; 1942, § 7462; Laws, 1930, ch. 28; Laws, 1940, ch. 301; Laws, 1946, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 525; Laws, 1976, ch. 360]

§§35-9-3,35-9-5. [Codes, 1930, §§ 5808-5810; 1942, §§ 7463-7465; Laws, 1930, ch. 28]

§35-9-7. [Codes, 1930, § 5812; 1942, § 7467; Laws, 1930, ch. 28; Laws, 1946, ch. 389, § 2]

§35-9-9. [Codes, 1930, § 5821; 1942, § 7482; Laws, 1930, ch. 28.]

§35-9-11. [Codes, 1930, §§ 5812, 5817; 1942, §§ 7467, 7478; Laws, 1930, ch. 28; Laws, 1938, ch. 360; Laws, 1946, ch. 389, § 2]

§§35-9-13 through35-9-27. [Codes, 1930, §§ 5810, 5811, 5813-5815, 5819, 5820, 5822; 1942, 7465, 7466, 7468-7470, 7480, 7481, 7483; Laws, 1930, ch. 28]

§35-9-29. [Codes, 1930, § 5816; 1942, § 7477; Laws, 1930, ch. 28; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 10]

§35-9-31. [Codes, 1930, § 5817; 1942, § 7478; Laws, 1930, ch. 28; Laws, 1938, ch. 360]

§§35-9-33,35-9-35. [Codes, 1930, §§ 5818, 5823, 5824; 1942, §§ 7479, 7484, 7485; Laws, 1930, ch. 28]